Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.245

Responses to audit findings on use of local revenues—Policies—Hearings—Disciplinary actions.

Before the beginning of the 2019-20 school year, each school district board of directors must adopt a policy for responding to any audit findings resulting from the audits conducted by the state auditor on the use of local revenues by the school district in accordance with RCW 28A.150.276 and 43.09.2856. The policy must require a public hearing by the school district board of directors of the findings of the state auditor within thirty days of the issuance of the findings; and may include progressive disciplinary actions for the district superintendent, which may be implemented by the school district board of directors.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 504.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.